Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 12 University of Rhode Island Research Corporation

35-12-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “University of Rhode Island Research Corporation Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-2.
Purpose and findings.

The purpose of this chapter is to authorize and implement a system of financial planning which would allow the university of Rhode Island (the “university”) to more accurately match revenues and expenditures for externally funded research programs for each fiscal year. The general assembly has found and hereby declares that it is in the public interest to encourage independent research activity at the university and further that it is essential to the financial well being of the state and the university that revenues from externally funded research programs be allocated to the fiscal years in which they accrue and be matched to the expenditures for the programs that are incurred for that fiscal year. The general assembly has further found that under the present system revenues are often received after the close of the fiscal year although the expenditures to which they are matched were incurred prior to the close of the fiscal year, and that, in fact, under certain programs, funds must be expended and then reimbursement sought from the contracting agency at a later date, often after the close of the fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning or intent:

“Accounts” means accounts receivable, representing amounts due or owing to the university from contracts with the federal government or other independent entities for research activities undertaken by the university, the obligation for the payment of which accounts has arisen.

“Corporation” means the governmental agency and public instrumentality authorized, created, and established pursuant to §

35-12-4

.

“Notes” means the notes, securities, or other obligations or evidences of indebtedness issued by the corporation pursuant to this chapter, all of which shall be issued under the name of or known as obligations of the “university of Rhode Island research corporation”.

“State” means the state of Rhode Island.

“University” means the university of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-4.
Creation — Powers — Construction of chapter — Termination.

There is hereby authorized, created, and established a public corporation of the state having a legal existence distinct from the state and not constituting a department of state government, to be known as the university of Rhode Island research corporation, with such powers as are set forth in this chapter, for the purposes of purchasing, taking, or acquiring accounts of the university, selling these accounts, and borrowing funds secured by these accounts.

It is the intent of the general assembly by the passage of this chapter to vest in the corporation all powers, authority, rights, privileges, and titles which may be necessary to enable it to accomplish the purposes set forth in this chapter, and this chapter and the powers granted hereby shall be liberally construed in conformity with these purposes.

The corporation and its corporate existence shall continue until terminated by law or until the corporation shall cease entirely and continuously to conduct or be involved in any business whatsoever in furtherance of its purposes; provided, that no termination shall take effect so long as the corporation shall have notes or other obligations outstanding, unless adequate provision shall have been made for the payment thereof pursuant to the documents securing the obligations or to that law. Upon termination of the existence of the corporation, all its rights and properties shall pass to and be vested in the university. At no time shall the assets or other property of the corporation inure to the benefit of any person or other corporation or entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-5.
General powers.

The corporation shall have all the powers necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the power to:

Sue and be sued, complain and defend, in its corporate name;

Have a seal which may be altered at pleasure, and use the seal by causing it, or a facsimile thereof, to be impressed or affixed or in any other manner reproduced;

Purchase, take, receive, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, use, and otherwise deal in and with, intangible personal property, or any interest therein;

Sell, convey, pledge, exchange, transfer, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of accounts for such consideration and upon such terms and conditions as the corporation shall determine;

Make contracts and incur liabilities, and borrow money at such rates of interest as the corporation may determine;

Make and execute all contracts, agreements, and instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the corporation granted by this chapter;

Invest and reinvest its funds;

Conduct its activities, carry on its operations, and have offices and exercise the powers granted by this chapter;

Make and alter by-laws, not inconsistent with this chapter, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the corporation, and the by-laws may contain provisions indemnifying any person who is or was a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, in the manner and to the extent provided in §

7-1.2-814

; and

Have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 23; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 23.

35-12-6.
Additional powers.

In addition to the powers enumerated in §

35-12-5

, the corporation shall have power to:

Purchase accounts from the university for such consideration and upon such terms and conditions as the corporation shall determine;

Pledge purchased accounts as security for any borrowings undertaken by the corporation or sell the accounts for such consideration and on such terms and conditions as the corporation shall determine;

Borrow money and issue notes and provide for the rights of the holders thereof, and secure the notes by assignment, pledge, or granting of a security interest in accounts, including, without limitation, all or a part of its interest in accounts for the purpose of providing funds to effectuate its purposes under this chapter; and

Create and establish such other fund or funds as may be necessary or desirable for its corporate purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-7.
Directors and officers.

The powers of the corporation shall be vested in a board of directors consisting of the following seven (7) members:

Chairperson of the board of governors for higher education;

Commissioner of higher education;

State budget officer;

President of the university;

Vice president for business and finance of the university;

Controller of the university; and

Vice president for academic affairs of the university.

The directors shall receive no compensation for the performance of their duties.

The board of directors shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson. Four (4) directors shall constitute a quorum and any action to be taken by the corporation under the provisions of this chapter may be authorized by resolution approved by at least four (4) of the directors present and voting at any regular or special meeting at which a quorum is present.

In addition to electing a chairperson, the board of directors shall appoint a secretary and such additional officers as they shall deem appropriate.

Any action taken by the corporation under the provisions of this chapter may be authorized by vote at any regular or special meeting, and the vote shall take effect immediately.

Any action required by this chapter to be taken at a meeting of the board of directors, or any action which may be taken at a meeting of the board of directors, or committee thereof, may be taken without a meeting if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so to be taken, shall be signed before or after that action by all of the directors, or all of the members of the committee, as the case may be.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-8.
Notes of the corporation.

The corporation shall have the power and is authorized to issue from time to time negotiable notes in one or more series, in such principal amounts as in the opinion of the corporation shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving its purposes, including:

Payment of interest on notes of the corporation;

Establishment of reserves to secure these notes; and

Making of all other expenditures of the corporation incident to and necessary or convenient to carrying out its corporate purposes and powers.

All notes issued by the corporation may be secured by the full faith and credit of the corporation, or may be payable solely out of revenues and receipts derived from the pledge or assignment of, grant of security interest in, or sale of, accounts owned by it or any part thereof, or upon investment earnings of any of these revenues, receipts, proceeds, or payments, or upon any other form of security available to the corporation for that purpose, all as may be designated in the proceedings of the corporation under which the notes shall be authorized to be issued. The notes may be executed and delivered by the corporation at any time or from time to time, may be in such form and denominations and of such tenor and maturities, and may be in bearer form or in registered form, as to principal and interest or as to principal alone, all as the corporation may determine.

Notes and any renewals thereof may be payable in such installments and at such times, not exceeding six (6) months from the date of the original issue of the notes, as shall be determined by the corporation.

Notes may be payable at such places, whether within or without the state, may bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such time or times and at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent herewith, all as shall be provided in the proceedings of the corporation under which they shall be authorized to be issued.

There may be retained by provisions made in the proceedings under which any notes of the corporation are authorized to be issued an option to redeem all or any part thereof, at the prices and upon such notice, and on such further terms and conditions, as shall be set forth on the record of the proceedings and on the face of the notes.

Moneys of the corporation, including without limitation revenues, receipts, proceeds, payments, or earnings listed in subsection (b), may be invested and reinvested in such obligations, securities, and other investments consistent with the purposes of this chapter as shall be specified in the resolutions under which the notes are authorized.

Issuance by the corporation of one or more series of notes for one or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other notes for the same purpose or purposes, but the proceedings whereunder any subsequent notes may be issued shall recognize and protect a prior pledge made for a prior issue of notes unless in the proceedings authorizing the prior issue the right is reserved to issue subsequent notes on a parity with the prior issue.

The members of the corporation shall not be subject to personal liability or accountability by reason of the issue of notes under this chapter.

Notes may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, body, bureau, or agency of the state, and without any other proceedings, conditions, or things other than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by this chapter and by the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the notes or the trust agreement securing the same.

Whether or not the notes are of such form and character as to be negotiable instruments under the terms of the Uniform Commercial Code, title 6A, the notes are hereby made negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for all the purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, subject only to the provisions of the notes for registration.

If a member of the corporation whose signature appears on the notes or coupons shall cease to be a member before the delivery of the notes, the member’s signature shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, as if the member had remained in office until the delivery.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-9.
Security for notes.

The principal of and interest on any notes issued by the corporation may be secured by a pledge or assignment of any revenues and receipts of the corporation and may be secured by a security interest or other instrument covering all or any part of one or more accounts acquired by the corporation pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

The resolution under which the notes are authorized to be issued and the security interest or other instrument may contain agreements and provisions respecting the servicing of the loans covered thereby, the fixing and collection of payments or repayments or other revenues therefrom, the creation and maintenance of special funds from these revenues, and the rights and remedies available in the event of default, all as the corporation shall deem advisable.

Each pledge, assignment, agreement, security interest, or other instrument made for the benefit or security of any of the notes of the corporation shall continue in effect until the principal of and interest on the notes for the benefit of which the notes was made shall have been fully paid, or until provision shall have been made for payment in the manner provided in the resolution under which the notes were authorized.

Any pledge made by the corporation shall be valid and binding from the time it is made. The money, accounts, or property pledged and thereafter received by the corporation shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act. The lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having a claim in tort, contract, or otherwise against the corporation, irrespective of whether the parties have notice of the claim. Neither the resolution nor any instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

Any resolution under which notes of the corporation are authorized to be issued (and any trust indenture established thereby) may contain provisions for vesting in a trustee or trustees such properties, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the corporation may determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-10.
Trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of notes or as revenues, receipts, or income, shall be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in the proceedings under which the notes are authorized. Any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, these money shall be deposited as trustee thereof shall hold and apply the money for the purposes thereof, subject to the applicable provisions of this chapter, the proceedings authorizing the notes, and the trust agreement securing the notes, if any.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-11.
Exemption from taxation.

The corporation shall not be required to pay state taxes of any kind, and the corporation, and its property and money, shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind by the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-12.
Notes as legal investments.

The notes of the corporation are hereby made securities in which all public officers and bodies of this state and municipalities and municipal subdivisions, all companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state may properly and legally invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-13.
Agreement of the state.

The state does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any notes issued under this chapter, that the state will not limit or alter the rights vested in the corporation to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders until these notes, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of holders, are fully met and discharged. The corporation is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state in any agreement with the holders of notes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-14.
Credit of the state.

Obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not constitute a debt, liability, or obligation of the state or of any political subdivision thereof other than the corporation, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or any political subdivision other than the corporation, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the corporation. Each obligation issued under this chapter shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the corporation shall not be obligated to pay the obligation or interest thereon except from revenues or assets pledged therefor, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any political subdivision thereof other than the corporation is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the obligation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-15.
Sale of accounts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute to the contrary, the president of the university is authorized and empowered to sell accounts to the corporation for such consideration and upon such terms and conditions as the president shall approve.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-16.
Annual report and audit.

The corporation shall submit to the board of governors for higher education, within four (4) months after the close of its fiscal year, a report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year. The report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering the corporation’s operations during the preceding fiscal year. The corporation shall cause an independent audit of its books and accounts to be made at least once each fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-17.
Chapter controlling over inconsistent provisions.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law or ordinance, general, special or local, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-18.
Construction with other statutes.

Nothing in this chapter shall restrict or limit the powers of the corporation arising under any laws of this state. This chapter shall be construed to provide a complete additional and alternative method for doing the things authorized by this chapter and shall be regarded as supplemental and in addition to the powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of all notes and other obligations of the corporation under the provisions of this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other statute applicable to the issuance of obligations. No proceedings or notice of approval shall be required for the issuance of any notes and other obligations or any instruments of security therefor except as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-19.
Liberal construction.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.

35-12-20.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of this chapter, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which that judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 324, § 1.